California statutes. Public Resources Code
No general obligation bonds shall be issued by the district unless the issuance thereof is approved by the electors of the district at a special election as provided in this article. If the district board finds that it is necessary to incur a bonded indebtedness to obtain funds with which to carry out the purposes of the district, it may submit the proposition to the voters of the district. For that purpose, a special election shall be called by resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49161.

The resolution shall state all of the following:

(a) The general objectives and purposes for which it is proposed to incur an indebtedness.

(b) A general description of all property to be acquired or damaged and work to be executed through the expenditure of the funds secured by the issuance and sale of the bonds.

(c) An estimate of the cost of the proposed work.

(d) The amount of the bonds proposed to be issued.

(e) The number of years beyond which the bonds are to run.

(f) The rate of interest or a maximum rate of interest to be paid.

(g) The date of the election.

(h) The election precincts, polling places, and election officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 605.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

49162.

For purposes of the bond election, the district board may consolidate into one precinct several precincts established for general election purposes and describe the precinct by reference to the general election precincts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49163.

An election board consisting of one inspector, one judge and one clerk shall be appointed by the district board for each precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49164.

Only voters registered in the district are eligible to vote at the bond election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49165.

A resolution calling the election shall be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the district and designated by the district board. No other notice of the election is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49166.

If two-thirds of the votes cast are in favor of incurring the bonded indebtedness as proposed, bonds of the district for the amount stated in the resolution calling the election shall be issued and sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49167.

The validity of the bonds after their issuance shall not be questioned in any court except on the ground that the provisions of this chapter authorizing their issuance are unconstitutional, or that the required hearing regarding the formation of the district was not regularly held or proper notice of it was not given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49168.

The district board shall prescribe, by resolution, the form of the bonds and interest coupons. The bonds shall be payable at the times and at a place to be fixed by the district board and designated in the bonds, together with interest on all sums unpaid on that date until all of the indebtedness has been paid. The term of the bonds issued shall not exceed 40 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49169.

The bonds shall be issued in the denominations that the district board determines, except that no bond shall be of a denomination less than one hundred dollars ($100) or greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The bonds shall be payable on the day and at the place fixed in the bonds, and with interest at the rate specified in the bonds, which rate shall not be in excess of 8 percent per annum and shall, after the first year, be payable semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49170.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairperson of the district board and countersigned by the county auditor, and the seal of the district board shall be affixed. The interest coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the county auditor by his or her engraved or lithographed signature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49171.

If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, his or her signature or countersignature shall be as valid as if he or she had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49172.

The district board may issue and sell bonds of the district at not less than par value, and the proceeds shall be placed in the treasury of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49173.

All premiums and accrued interest received shall be paid into the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds and the remainder of the proceeds of the sale shall be paid into the construction fund of the district. Proper records of the transactions shall be placed upon the books of the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49174.

(a) The funds in the construction fund shall be applied exclusively to the purposes and objects mentioned in the resolution calling the bond election. 

(b) Payments from the construction fund shall be made upon demands authorized by the district board, and shall be prepared, presented, and audited in the same manner as demands upon funds of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49175.

If the proposition of issuing bonds submitted at the bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the district board may, after expiration of six months after that election, call or order another bond election, either for the same objects and purposes, or for any other object or purpose of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49176.

If bonds have been issued by the district and the proceeds of the sale have been expended and the district board, by resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, determines that the public interest or necessity of the district demands the issuance of additional bonds for carrying out any of the objects of the district, the district board may again submit to the voters the question of issuing additional bonds in the same manner as for a first issue. All provisions of this chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds, and for the expenditure of proceeds, apply to the issuance of additional bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49177.

Bonds and interest thereon shall be paid by revenue derived from an annual tax upon the property in the district, and all the property in the district shall be and remain liable to be taxed for those payments.

The bonds and the interest thereon shall not be taxable in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49178.

(a) An issue of bonds is hereby defined to be the aggregate principal amount of all of the bonds authorized to be issued in accordance with a proposal submitted to and approved by the electors of the district, but no indebtedness is deemed to have been contracted until bonds have been sold and delivered and then only to the extent of the principal amount of the bonds so sold and delivered.

(b) The district board issuing bonds may, in its discretion, divide the aggregate principal amount of the issue into two or more divisions or series and fix different dates for the bonds of each separate division or series. If any authorized issue is divided into two or more divisions or series, the bonds of each division or series may be made payable at the time or times fixed by the district board, separate and distinct from the time or times for the payment of bonds of any other division or series of the same issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49179.

Whenever a district has issued bonds, in its annual statement to the board of supervisors as to the amount of money needed for district purposes during the next ensuing fiscal year pursuant to Section 44140, the district board shall include, in addition thereto, the amount necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, those bonds that will become due before the time for making the next general tax levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49180.

If the district board fails to furnish to the board of supervisors a statement of the amount of money necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as required by Section 49179, the board of supervisors shall ascertain that amount and shall levy it and cause it to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49181.

The principal of, and interest on, the bonds shall be paid by the treasurer of the county in the manner prescribed by law for the principal of, and interest on, the bonds of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Revenue Bonds [49190. - 49190.]

49190.

A district formed pursuant to this chapter is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and the provisions of that law are applicable to that district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Change of Boundaries [49195. - 49195.]

49195.

The boundaries of any district may be altered, and outlying contiguous territory, whether incorporated or unincorporated, may be annexed pursuant to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Franchise by Counties [49200. - 49205.]

49200.

Every franchise or permit for the collection, disposal, or destruction, or any combination thereof, of garbage, waste, offal, and debris, shall be granted by the board of supervisors only under the terms and conditions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49201.

(a) Any county may, by resolution adopted by the board of supervisors, call for bids for the granting of a franchise or permit, exclusive or otherwise, for the collection, disposal, or destruction, or any combination thereof, of garbage, waste, offal, and debris, according to the terms and conditions set forth in the resolution, for a period of time not to exceed 25 years.

(b) After adoption of the resolution pursuant to subdivision (a), the board of supervisors shall cause to be published once a week for two successive weeks a notice which shall set forth all of the terms and conditions in the resolution and the time, date, and place for the receiving and opening of sealed bids, which shall not be sooner than four full weeks from date of the first publication of the notice.

(c) Upon examination by the board of supervisors of the bids, the franchise or permit may be awarded to the lowest qualified bidder. The board of supervisors may postpone the granting of the franchise or permit from time to time until it has had a full and complete opportunity to examine the merits of each bid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49202.

The successful bidder shall file with the board of supervisors, upon grant of the franchise or permit, a bond in favor of the county in an amount and under the terms and conditions prescribed by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49203.

The county may, in the resolution and advertised notice, impose terms and conditions other than those specified in this chapter if they are not in conflict with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49204.

A bidder may in his or her franchise or permit bid set forth any propositions, terms, and conditions that the bidder may desire to offer, or receive the benefit from, which may be in addition to, or in conflict with, those specified in the resolution or advertised notice calling for bids, if they are not in conflict with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49205.

The board of supervisors which, prior to July 1, 1980, adopted an ordinance governing the granting of franchises or permits for the collection, disposal, or destruction, or any combination thereof, of garbage, waste, offal, and debris, and which granted franchises or permits pursuant to that ordinance covering defined zones or areas of the county, may extend the term of any of those franchises or permits for only one additional period not exceeding 25 years without advertising or calling for bids as required by Section 49201, if all of the following conditions exist:

(a) (1) The county franchise or permit ordinance contains rules and regulations for the protection of the public health and welfare and provides that the board of supervisors may control the rates to be charged customers by the franchise or permitholders.

(2) Notwithstanding any provision in a county ordinance, the board of supervisors shall not increase the rates to be charged to customers by franchise or permitholders without first calling and holding a public hearing on the proposed increase in rates. Publication of notice of the hearing required by this paragraph shall be made by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(b) The franchise or permit proposed to be extended was granted in strict compliance with the requirements for calling and advertising for bids and award to the lowest qualified bidder pursuant to Section 49201, and was otherwise granted in strict compliance with this chapter.

(c) The franchise or permit proposed to be extended was granted on a nonexclusive basis so that the board of supervisors is not precluded from granting additional franchises or permits to cover the same areas if, in the judgment and discretion of the board of supervisors, the public interest will be served thereby. 

(d) The county franchise or permit ordinance authorizes the county auditor or any other qualified public accountant to audit periodically the books and records of the franchise or permitholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. City Garbage Disposal Contracts [49300. - 49300.]

49300.

The legislative body of a city may contract for the collection or disposal, or both, of garbage, waste, refuse, rubbish, offal, trimmings, or other refuse matter under the terms and conditions that are prescribed by the legislative body of the city by resolution or ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 590, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Garbage and Refuse Dumps [49400. - 49400.]

49400.

No city, county, district, or public or municipal corporation shall acquire and operate, or cause to be acquired and operated, a dump or site for the disposal of garbage or refuse, or a transfer station or collection point for garbage or refuse, within a city without the consent of the city council or within the unincorporated area of a county without the consent of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Solid Waste Enterprises [49500. - 49524.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [49500. - 49505.]

49500.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49501.

“Exclusive solid waste handling services” means any action by a local agency, whether by franchise, contract, license, permit, or otherwise, whereby the agency itself or one or more other local agencies or solid waste enterprises has the exclusive right to provide solid waste handling services of any class or type within all or any part of the territory of the local agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49501.3.

“Lawfully provided” means the services of the solid waste enterprise are in substantial compliance with the terms and conditions of its franchise, contract, license, or permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 811, Sec. 2.   Effective September 24, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49501.5.

“License” means a solid waste license issued by a local agency or a business license issued by a local agency if the local agency has not established any other form of authorization for the lawful provision of solid waste handling services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 811, Sec. 3.   Effective September 24, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49502.

“Local agency” means any county, city, or district having the authority to provide solid waste handling services either by the agency itself or by authorizing or permitting other local agencies or solid waste enterprises to provide solid waste handling services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49503.

“Solid waste” means all putrescible and nonputrescible solid and semisolid wastes, including garbage, trash, refuse, paper, rubbish, ashes, industrial wastes, demolition and construction wastes, abandoned vehicles and parts thereof, discarded home and industrial appliances, manure, vegetable or animal solid or semisolid wastes, and other discarded solid and semisolid wastes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49504.

“Solid waste enterprise” means any individual, partnership, joint venture, unincorporated private organization, or private corporation regularly engaged in the business of providing solid waste handling services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49505.

“Solid waste handling services” means the collection, transportation, storage, transfer, or processing of solid wastes for residential, commercial, institutional, or industrial users or customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Legislative Findings [49510. - 49510.]

49510.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Although local agencies are authorized to furnish solid waste handling services, in extensive parts of the state solid waste enterprises are furnishing all or substantial portions of necessary solid waste handling services.

(b) It is in the public interest to foster and encourage solid waste enterprises so that, at all times, there will continue to be competent enterprises willing and financially able to furnish needed solid waste handling services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Continuation of Services [49520. - 49524.]

49520.

If a local agency has authorized, by franchise, contract, license, or permit, a solid waste enterprise to provide solid waste handling services and those services have been lawfully provided for more than three previous years, the solid waste enterprise may continue to provide those services up to five years after mailed notification to the solid waste enterprise by the local agency having jurisdiction that exclusive solid waste handling services are to be provided or authorized, unless the solid waste enterprise has an exclusive franchise or contract.

If the solid waste enterprise has an exclusive franchise or contract, the solid waste enterprise shall continue to provide those services and shall be limited to the unexpired term of the contract or franchise or five years, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 811, Sec. 4.   Effective September 24, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49521.

A solid waste enterprise providing continuation solid waste handling services pursuant to Section 49520 is subject to the following conditions:

(a) The services of the solid waste enterprise shall be in substantial compliance with the terms and conditions of the franchise, contract, license, or permit, and meet the quality and frequency of services required by the local agency in other areas not served by the solid waste enterprise.

(b) If the local agency has established rates for solid waste handling services, the solid waste enterprise may be required by the local agency to adhere to rates that are comparable to those established by the local agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 811, Sec. 5.   Effective September 24, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49522.

Nothing in this chapter affects the right of a city following annexation to terminate for cause a franchise, contract, license, or permit held by a solid waste enterprise authorized by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49523.

Any local agency or solid waste handling enterprise may contract, upon mutually satisfactory terms, for the termination of all or any part of the business of the solid waste enterprise before the expiration of the period specified in Section 49520.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49524.

Notwithstanding Section 49523, a solid waste enterprise may not waive the right to continue to provide solid waste handling services as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 811, Sec. 6.   Effective September 24, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Burning Garbage [49600. - 49620.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [49600. - 49602.]

49600.

No person shall operate in any city or town any crematory for the destruction by fire heat of garbage, ashes, offal, or other refuse matter, except as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49601.

No crematory described in Section 49600 shall be operated in this state except in a manner which will prevent the propagation of disease through contamination of the atmosphere of any city or town by the gases or fumes arising from the fires or ovens of the crematory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49602.

Every person who burns by fire heat or destroys by cremation any garbage, ashes, offal, or other refuse matter in violation of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cremation of Animal Refuse [49620. - 49620.]

49620.

Any person who destroys, or who attempts to destroy, the carcass of any dead animal, or the offal from any slaughter pen, corral, or butcher shop by fire within one-fourth of a mile of any city, town, or village, except in a crematory whose construction and operation are satisfactory to the board of health of the city or the health officer of the town, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or by fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. Premoistened Nonwoven Disposable Wipes [49650. - 49654.]

49650.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Covered entity” means the manufacturer of a covered product that is sold in the state or offered for sale in the state. “Covered entity” includes a wholesaler, supplier, or retailer that is responsible for the labeling or packaging of a covered product.

(b) “Covered product” means a consumer product sold in the state or offered for sale in the state that is either of the following:

(1) A premoistened nonwoven disposable wipe marketed as a baby wipe or diapering wipe.

(2) A premoistened nonwoven disposable wipe that is both of the following:

(A) Composed entirely of or in part of petrochemical-derived fibers.

(B) Likely to be used in a bathroom and has significant potential to be flushed, including baby wipes, bathroom cleaning wipes, toilet cleaning wipes, hard surface cleaning wipes, disinfecting wipes, hand sanitizing wipes, antibacterial wipes, facial and makeup removal wipes, general purpose cleaning wipes, personal care wipes for use on the body, feminine hygiene wipes, adult incontinence wipes, adult hygiene wipes, and body cleansing wipes.

(c) “High contrast” means satisfying both of the following conditions:

(1) Is provided by either a light symbol on a solid dark background or a dark symbol on a solid light background.

(2) Has at least 70 percent contrast between the symbol artwork and background using the following formula:

(A) (B1 – B2) / B1 * 100 = contrast percentage.

(B) B1 = the light reflectance value of the lighter area and B2 = the light reflectance value of the darker area.

(d) (1) “Label notice” means the phrase “Do Not Flush” and the size of the label notice shall be equal to at least 2 percent of the surface area of the principal display panel in size.

(2) For covered products regulated pursuant to the Federal Hazardous Substances Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1261 et seq.) by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission under Section 1500.121 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if the label notice requirements in paragraph (1) would result in a type size larger than first aid instructions pursuant to the Federal Hazardous Substances Act, the type size for the label notice shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, be equal to or greater than the type size required for the first aid instructions.

(3) For covered products required to be registered by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under the Federal Insecticide,
 Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.), if the label notice requirements in paragraph (1) would result in a type size on the principal display panel larger than a warning pursuant to the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, the type size for the label notice shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, be equal to or greater than the type size required for the “keep out of reach of children” statement under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act.

(e) (1) “Principal display panel” means the side of the product package that is most likely to be displayed, presented, or shown under customary conditions of display for retail sale.

(2) In the case of a cylindrical or nearly cylindrical package, the surface area of the principal display panel constitutes 40 percent of the product package as measured by multiplying the height of the container by the circumference.

(3) In the case of a flexible film package in which a rectangular prism or nearly rectangular prism stack of wipes is housed within the film, the surface area of the principal display panel is measured by multiplying the length by the width of the side of the package when the flexible packaging film is pressed flat against the stack of wipes on all sides of the stack.

(f) “Symbol” means the “Do Not Flush” symbol, or a gender equivalent thereof, as depicted in the INDA/EDANA Code of Practice Second Edition and published within “Guidelines for Assessing
 the Flushability of Disposable Nonwoven Products,” Edition 4, May 2018. The symbol shall be sized equal to at least 2 percent of the surface area of the principal display panel, except as specified in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 49651.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 590, Sec. 2.   (AB 818)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

49651.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (f), a covered product manufactured on or after July 1, 2022, shall be labeled clearly and conspicuously in adherence with the following labeling requirements:

 (1) In the case of cylindrical or near cylindrical packaging intended to dispense individual wipes, a covered entity shall comply with one of the following options:

(A) Place the symbol and label notice on the principal display panel in a location reasonably viewable each time a wipe is dispensed.

(B) Place the symbol on the
 principal display panel, and either the symbol or label notice, or the symbol and label notice in combination, on the flip lid, subject to the following:

(i) If the label notice does not appear on the flip lid, the label notice shall be placed on the principal display panel.

(ii) The symbol or label notice, or the symbol and label notice in combination, on the flip lid may be embossed, and in that case are not required to comply with paragraph (6).

(iii) The symbol or label notice, or the symbol and label notice in combination, on the flip lid shall cover a minimum of 8 percent of the surface area of the flip lid.

(2) In the case of flexible film packaging
 intended to dispense individual wipes, a covered entity shall place the symbol on the principal display panel and dispensing side panel and place the label notice on either the principal display panel or dispensing side panel in a prominent location reasonably visible to the user each time a wipe is dispensed. If the principal display panel is on the dispensing side of the package, two symbols are not required.

(3) In the case of refillable tubs or other rigid packaging intended to dispense individual wipes and be reused by the consumer for that purpose, a covered entity shall place the symbol and label notice on the principal display panel in a prominent location reasonably visible to the user each time a wipe is dispensed.

(4) In the case of packaging not intended to dispense individual wipes,
 a covered entity shall place the symbol and label notice on the principal display panel in a prominent and reasonably visible location.

(5) A covered entity shall ensure the packaging seams, folds,
 or other package design elements do not obscure the symbol or the label notice.

(6) A covered entity shall ensure the symbol and label notice have sufficiently high contrast with the immediate background of the packaging to render it likely to be seen and read by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

(b) For covered products sold in bulk at retail, both the outer package visible at retail and the individual packages contained within shall comply with the labeling requirements in subdivision (a) applicable to the particular packaging types, except the following:

(1) Individual packages contained within the outer package that are not intended to dispense individual wipes
 and contain no retail labeling.

(2) Outer packages that do not obscure the symbol and label notice on individual packages contained within.

(c) If a covered product is provided within the same packaging as another consumer product for use in combination with the other product, the outside retail packaging of the other consumer product does not need to comply with the labeling requirements of subdivision (a).

(d) If a covered product is provided within the same package as another consumer product for use in combination with the other product and is in a package smaller than three inches by three inches, the covered entity may comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) by placing the symbol and label notice in a
 prominent location reasonably visible to the user of the covered product.

(e) A covered entity, directly or through a corporation, partnership, subsidiary, division, trade name, or association in connection to the manufacturing, labeling, packaging, advertising, promotion, offering for sale, sale, or distribution of a covered product, shall not make any representation, in any manner, expressly or by implication, including through the use of a product name, endorsement, depiction, illustration, trademark, or trade name, about the flushable attributes, flushable benefits, flushable performance, or flushable efficacy of a covered product.

(f) (1) If a covered product is required to be registered by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under the
 Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.) and the Department of Pesticide Regulation under Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401) of the Food and Agricultural Code, then the covered entity shall submit a label compliant with the labeling requirements of subdivision (a) no later than January 1, 2023, to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and upon its approval, to the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(2) If the United States Environmental Protection Agency or the Department of Pesticide Regulation does not approve a product label that otherwise complies with the labeling requirements of subdivision (a), the covered entity shall use a label with as many of the requirements of this section as the relevant agency has approved.

(g) A covered entity may include on a covered product words or phrases in addition to those required for the label notice if the words or phrases are consistent with the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 590, Sec. 2.   (AB 818)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

49652.

(a) The California Consumer Education and Outreach Program is hereby established. As part of the program, covered entities, in collaboration with other covered entities, shall do all of the following:

(1) Participate in a collection study conducted in collaboration with wastewater agencies for the purpose of gaining understanding of consumer behavior regarding the flushing of covered products as a key input into the design of a consumer education and outreach program. The collection study shall be jointly coordinated by the California Association of Sanitation Agencies and a group of covered entities.

(2) Conduct a consumer opinion survey to identify baseline consumer behavior and awareness regarding the flushing or other disposal of covered products.

(3) Measure effectiveness of the consumer education program on consumer awareness of the symbol and label notice and consumer attitudes about disposal of covered products by conducting a subsequent consumer awareness survey comparing the baseline data provided by the 2022 survey with survey data from subsequent years. The surveys to determine the effectiveness and ongoing success of the consumer education program shall take place annually until December 31, 2026.

(b) Covered entities, either independently or in collaboration with other covered entities or other organizations, shall conduct a comprehensive multimedia
 education and outreach program in the state. At a minimum, the education and outreach program shall do both of the following:

(1) Promote consumer awareness and understanding of and compliance with the symbol and label notice requirements. Covered entities shall provide wastewater agencies with the consumer education messaging for the symbol and the label notice. The wastewater agencies may include the messaging as part of their routine communications with customers within their service area.

(2) Provide education and outreach in Spanish and English.

(c) Covered entities shall take reasonable steps to ensure that they do not promote products outside of the scope of this part as part of the education and outreach
 program.

(d) Covered entities shall take reasonable steps to ensure that their education and outreach program does not conflict with the programs of other covered entities or groups of covered entities.

(e) Covered entities, either independently or in collaboration with other covered entities, shall report to the Senate Committee on Environmental Quality, the Assembly Committee on Environmental Safety and Toxic Materials, and the State Water Resources Control Board on their activities under this section on an annual basis. The State Water Resources Control Board shall post the reports on its internet website.

(f) The California Consumer Education and Outreach Program shall conclude on December 31, 2026. 

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 590, Sec. 2.   (AB 818)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

49653.

(a) A person who violates Section 49651 may be enjoined in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) (1) A covered entity who violates Section 49651 may be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per day, up to a maximum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation. That civil penalty may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in any court of competent jurisdiction. For purposes of this section, offering for sale or selling in California one or more units of the same covered product labeled in violation of Section 49651
 shall constitute a single violation for each day the noncompliant units are offered for sale or sold.

(2) In assessing the amount of a civil penalty for a violation of Section 49651, the court shall consider all of the following:

(A) The nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation.

(B) The violator’s past and present efforts to prevent, abate, or clean up conditions posing a threat to the public health or safety or the environment.

(C) The violator’s ability to pay the proposed penalty.

(D) The effect that the proposed penalty would have on the violator and the community as a whole.

(E) Whether the violator took good faith measures to comply with this part and when these measures were taken.

(F) The deterrent effect that the imposition of the penalty would have on both the violator and the regulated community as a whole.

(G) Any other factor that justice may require.

(c) Actions may be brought pursuant to this section by the Attorney General in the name of the people of the state, by a district attorney, by a city attorney, by a county counsel, or by a city prosecutor in a city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor.
